Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1310
Records and
information; confidential; unauthorized disclosure; penalty.

All records and information regarding foster children and their
parents or relatives in the possession of the office or
local board shall be deemed confidential. Unauthorized disclosure of such
confidential records and information or any violation of the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the Department of
Health and Human Services or the office shall
be a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1982, LB 714, § 10;

Laws 1990, LB 1222, § 9;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 198;

Laws 2012, LB998, § 11.